Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB332.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local governmental entity" means a:
1. Public library as defined in KRS 171.125; or
2. City; and
(b) "Local official" means a circuit clerk, county clerk, county sheriff, or
county judge/executive.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall expand the availability of driver licensing
services by establishing a system in which one (1) local official or local
governmental entity in each county may issue operator's licenses and personal
identification cards through a mutual agreement between that local official or
local governmental entity and the Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation
Cabinet shall identify a local official or local governmental entity in each county
to participate in the system by July 1, 2027.
(3) The Transportation Cabinet shall purchase and install all necessary equipment
and hardware for each local official or local governmental entity issuing
operator's licenses and personal identification cards under this section.
(4) In addition to the fees set forth in Section 2 of this Act, a local official or local
governmental entity may charge and retain a convenience fee for each operator's
license or personal identification card issued under this section.
(5) A local official or local governmental entity issuing documents under this section
shall not issue commercial driver's licenses or travel IDs.
(6) By October 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the Transportation Cabinet shall
report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 415
Committee on Transportation on:
(a) The number of operator's licenses and personal identification cards issued
in each county during the previous fiscal year under this section; and
(b) Information regarding the effect that issuance of identity documents by
local officials and local governmental entities had on wait times at regional
licensing offices.
Section 2. KRS 186.531 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "GF" means the general fund;
(b) "IP" means instruction permit;
(c) "License fund" or "LF" means the KYTC photo license account created in
KRS 174.056;
(d) "MC" means motorcycle;
(e) "MC fund" or "MCF" means the motorcycle safety education program fund
established in KRS 176.5065;
(f) "OL" means operator's license; and
(g) "PIDC" means personal identification card.
(2) The fees imposed for voluntary travel ID operator's licenses, instruction permits,
and personal identification cards shall be as follows. The fees received shall be
distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an
eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $48 $48 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $18 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $16 $2 $0
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 415
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $13 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $58 $48 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $25 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
(3) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the fees imposed for standard
operator's licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as
follows and, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $43 $43 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $15 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $13 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $33 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $53 $43 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $20 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
PIDC (no fixed address) under
KRS 186.4122(5)/186.4123(5)
(initial, duplicate, or corrected) $0 $0 $0 $0
(4) The fee for a four (4) year original or renewal license issued pursuant to KRS
186.4101 shall be fifty percent (50%) of the amount shown in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section. The distribution of fees shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 415
section shall also be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses that are issued for
four (4) years.
(5) Any fee for any identity document applied for using alternative technology under
KRS 186.410 and 186.4122 shall be distributed in the same manner as a document
applied for in person with the cabinet.
(6) (a) An applicant for an original or renewal operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card
shall be requested by the cabinet to make a donation to promote an organ
donor program.
(b) The donation under this subsection shall be added to the regular fee for an
original or renewal motor vehicle operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card.
One (1) donation may be made per issuance or renewal of a license or any
combination thereof.
(c) The fee shall be paid to the cabinet and shall be forwarded by the cabinet on a
monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks' Trust for Life, and such
moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of
promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this subsection shall be
voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of issuance or
renewal.
(7) In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the following individuals, upon
application for an initial or renewal operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card, shall pay an additional application fee of thirty dollars
($30), which shall be deposited in the photo license account:
(a) An applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident and who
applies under KRS 186.4121 or 186.4123; or
(b) An applicant who is applying for a instruction permit, operator's license, or
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 415
personal identification card without a photo under KRS 186.4102(9).
(8) (a) Except for individuals exempted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, an
applicant for relicensing after revocation or suspension shall pay a
reinstatement fee of forty dollars ($40).
(b) The reinstatement fee under this subsection shall be distributed by the State
Treasurer as follows:
1. Thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be deposited into the photo license
account; and
2. Five dollars ($5) shall be deposited into a trust and agency fund to be
used in defraying the costs and expenses of administering a driver
improvement program for problem drivers.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to:
1. Any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the
conditions set out in KRS 186.411 when, within one (1) year of
suspension, the driving privileges of the individual are reinstated; or
2. A student who has had his or her license revoked pursuant to KRS
159.051.
(9) As payment for any fee identified in this section, the cabinet:
(a) Shall accept cash and personal checks;
(b) May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS 45.345; and
(c) May enter into billing agreements with homeless shelters, health care
facilities, or social service agencies that serve individuals without an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return.
(10) There shall be no fee assessed at a regional licensing office for the initial, renewal,
or duplicate standard personal identification card to an individual, if the individual:
(a) Does not possess a valid operator's license or a commercial driver's license;
and
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 415
(b) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next regular election.
(11) For any operator's license or personal identification card issued by a local
official or local governmental entity under Section 1 of this Act, the local official
or local governmental entity may charge a convenience fee to be retained by the
local official or local governmental entity.
Section 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 1/12/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed